script/syll.xfst
define nngii = [ n n g i i ] -> ᙱ  ; 
define nnguu = [ n n g u u ] -> ᙳ  ; 
define nngaa = [ n n g a a ] -> ᙵ  ; 

define ngaai = [ n g a a i ] -> ᙰ  ; 
define ngii = [ n g i i ] -> ᖏ  ; 
define nguu = [ n g u u ] -> ᖑ  ; 
define ngaa = [ n g a a ] -> ᖓ  ; 

define paai = [ p a a i ] -> ᐯ  ; 
define pii = [ p i i ] -> ᐲ  ; 
define puu = [ p u u ] -> ᐴ  ; 
define paa = [ p a a ] -> ᐹ  ; 

define taai = [ t a a i ] -> ᑌ  ; 
define tii = [ t i i ] -> ᑏ  ; 
define tuu = [ t u u ] -> ᑑ  ; 
define taa = [ t a a ] -> ᑖ  ; 

define kaai = [ k a a i ] -> ᑫ  ; 
define kii = [ k i i ] -> ᑮ  ; 
define kuu = [ k u u ] -> ᑰ  ; 
define kaa = [ k a a ] -> ᑳ  ; 

define gaai = [ g a a i ] -> ᒉ  ; 
define gii = [ g i i ] -> ᒌ  ; 
define guu = [ g u u ] -> ᒎ  ; 
define gaa = [ g a a ] -> ᒑ  ; 

define maai = [ m a a i ] -> ᒣ  ; 
define mii = [ m i i ] -> ᒦ  ; 
define muu = [ m u u ] -> ᒨ  ; 
define maa = [ m a a ] -> ᒫ  ; 

define naai = [ n a a i ] -> ᓀ  ; 
define nii = [ n i i ] -> ᓃ  ; 
define nuu = [ n u u ] -> ᓅ  ; 
define naa = [ n a a ] -> ᓈ  ; 

define saai = [ s a a i ] -> ᓭ  ; 
define sii = [ s i i ] -> ᓰ  ; 
define suu = [ s u u ] -> ᓲ  ; 
define saa = [ s a a ] -> ᓵ  ; 

define haai = [ h a a i ] -> ᓭ  ; 
define hii = [ h i i ] -> ᓰ  ; 
define huu = [ h u u ] -> ᓲ  ; 
define haa = [ h a a ] -> ᓵ  ; 

define laai = [ l a a i ] -> ᓓ  ; 
define lii = [ l i i ] -> ᓖ  ; 
define luu = [ l u u ] -> ᓘ  ; 
define laa = [ l a a ] -> ᓛ  ; 

define jaai = [ j a a i ] -> ᔦ  ; 
define jii = [ j i i ] -> ᔩ  ; 
define juu = [ j u u ] -> ᔫ  ; 
define jaa = [ j a a ] -> ᔮ  ; 

define vaai = [ v a a i ] -> ᕓ  ; 
define vii = [ v i i ] -> ᕖ  ; 
define vuu = [ v u u ] -> ᕘ  ; 
define vaa = [ v a a ] -> ᕚ  ; 

define raai = [ r a a i ] -> ᕃ  ; 
define rii = [ r i i ] -> ᕇ  ; 
define ruu = [ r u u ] -> ᕉ  ; 
define raa = [ r a a ] -> ᕌ  ; 

define qaai = [ q a a i ] -> ᙯ  ; 
define qii = [ q i i ] -> ᖀ  ; 
define quu = [ q u u ] -> ᖂ  ; 
define qaa = [ q a a ] -> ᖄ  ; 

define łii = [ ł i i ] -> ᖡ  ; 
define łuu = [ ł u u ] -> ᖣ  ; 
define łaa = [ ł a a ] -> ᖥ  ; 

define aai = [ a a i ] -> ᐁ  ; 
define ii = [ i i ] -> ᐄ  ; 
define uu = [ u u ] -> ᐆ  ; 
define aa = [ a a ] -> ᐋ  ; 



define nngi = [ n n g i ] -> ᙱ  ; 
define nngu = [ n n g u ] -> ᙳ  ; 
define nnga = [ n n g a ] -> ᙵ  ; 

define ngai = [ n g a i ] -> ᙰ  ; 
define ngi = [ n g i ] -> ᖏ  ; 
define ngu = [ n g u ] -> ᖑ  ; 
define nga = [ n g a ] -> ᖓ  ; 

define pai = [ p a i ] -> ᐯ  ; 
define pi = [ p i ] -> ᐱ  ; 
define pu = [ p u ] -> ᐳ  ; 
define pa = [ p a ] -> ᐸ  ; 

define tai = [ t a i ] -> ᑌ  ; 
define ti = [ t i ] -> ᑎ  ; 
define tu = [ t u ] -> ᑐ  ; 
define ta = [ t a ] -> ᑕ  ; 

define kai = [ k a i ] -> ᑫ  ; 
define ki = [ k i ] -> ᑭ  ; 
define ku = [ k u ] -> ᑯ  ; 
define ka = [ k a ] -> ᑲ  ; 

define gai = [ g a i ] -> ᒉ  ; 
define gi = [ g i ] -> ᒋ  ; 
define gu = [ g u ] -> ᒍ  ; 
define ga = [ g a ] -> ᒐ  ; 

define mai = [ m a i ] -> ᒣ  ; 
define mi = [ m i ] -> ᒥ  ; 
define mu = [ m u ] -> ᒧ  ; 
define ma = [ m a ] -> ᒪ  ; 

define nai = [ n a i ] -> ᓀ  ; 
define ni = [ n i ] -> ᓂ  ; 
define nu = [ n u ] -> ᓄ  ; 
define na = [ n a ] -> ᓇ  ; 

define sai = [ s a i ] -> ᓭ  ; 
define si = [ s i ] -> ᓯ  ; 
define su = [ s u ] -> ᓱ  ; 
define sa = [ s a ] -> ᓴ  ; 

define hai = [ h a i ] -> ᓭ  ; 
define hi = [ h i ] -> ᓯ  ; 
define hu = [ h u ] -> ᓱ  ; 
define ha = [ h a ] -> ᓴ  ; 

define lai = [ l a i ] -> ᓓ  ; 
define li = [ l i ] -> ᓕ  ; 
define lu = [ l u ] -> ᓗ  ; 
define la = [ l a ] -> ᓚ  ; 

define jai = [ j a i ] -> ᔦ  ; 
define ji = [ j i ] -> ᔨ  ; 
define ju = [ j u ] -> ᔪ  ; 
define ja = [ j a ] -> ᔭ  ; 

define vai = [ v a i ] -> ᕓ  ; 
define vi = [ v i ] -> ᕕ  ; 
define vu = [ v u ] -> ᕗ  ; 
define va = [ v a ] -> ᕙ  ; 

define rai = [ r a i ] -> ᕃ  ; 
define ri = [ r i ] -> ᕆ  ; 
define ru = [ r u ] -> ᕈ  ; 
define ra = [ r a ] -> ᕋ  ; 

define qai = [ q a i ] -> ᙯ  ; 
define qi = [ q i ] -> ᕿ  ; 
define qu = [ q u ] -> ᖁ  ; 
define qa = [ q a ] -> ᖃ  ; 

define łi = [ ł i ] -> ᖠ  ; 
define łu = [ ł u ] -> ᖢ  ; 
define ła = [ ł a ] -> ᖤ  ; 

define ai = [ a i ] -> ᐁ  ; 
define i = [ i ] -> ᐃ  ; 
define u = [ u ] -> ᐅ  ; 
define a = [ a ] -> ᐊ  ; 

define p = [ p ] -> ᑉ  ;
define t = [ t ] -> ᑦ  ;
define k = [ k ] -> ᒃ  ;
define g = [ g ] -> ᖅ  ;
define m = [ m ] -> ᒻ  ;
define n = [ n ] -> ᓐ  ;

define h = [ h ] -> ᕻ  ;
define l = [ l ] -> ᓪ  ;
#define #j = [ #j ] ->   ;
define v = [ v ] -> ᕝ  ;
define r = [ r ] -> ᕐ  ;
define q = [ q ] -> ᖅ  ;
define ng = [ n g ] -> ᖕ  ;
define nng = [ n n g ] -> ᖖ  ;
define ł = [ ł ] -> ᖦ  ;



read regex [ nngii
.o. nnguu
.o. nngaa

.o. ngaai
.o. ngii
.o. nguu
.o. ngaa

.o. paai
.o. pii
.o. puu
.o. paa

.o. taai
.o. tii
.o. tuu
.o. taa

.o. kaai
.o. kii
.o. kuu
.o. kaa

.o. gaai
.o. gii
.o. guu
.o. gaa

.o. maai
.o. mii
.o. muu
.o. maa

.o. naai
.o. nii
.o. nuu
.o. naa

.o. saai
.o. sii
.o. suu
.o. saa

.o. haai
.o. hii
.o. huu
.o. haa

.o. laai
.o. lii
.o. luu
.o. laa

.o. jaai
.o. jii
.o. juu
.o. jaa

.o. vaai
.o. vii
.o. vuu
.o. vaa

.o. raai
.o. rii
.o. ruu
.o. raa

.o. qaai
.o. qii
.o. quu
.o. qaa


.o. łii
.o. łuu
.o. łaa

.o. aai
.o. ii
.o. uu
.o. aa

.o. nngi
.o. nngu
.o. nnga

.o. ngai
.o. ngi
.o. ngu
.o. nga

.o. pai
.o. pi
.o. pu
.o. pa

.o. tai
.o. ti
.o. tu
.o. ta

.o. kai
.o. ki
.o. ku
.o. ka

.o. gai
.o. gi
.o. gu
.o. ga

.o. mai
.o. mi
.o. mu
.o. ma

.o. nai
.o. ni
.o. nu
.o. na

.o. sai
.o. si
.o. su
.o. sa

.o. hai
.o. hi
.o. hu
.o. ha

.o. lai
.o. li
.o. lu
.o. la

.o. jai
.o. ji
.o. ju
.o. ja

.o. vai
.o. vi
.o. vu
.o. va

.o. rai
.o. ri
.o. ru
.o. ra

.o. qai
.o. qi
.o. qu
.o. qa

.o. łi
.o. łu
.o. ła

.o. ai
.o. i
.o. u
.o. a

.o. p
.o. t
.o. k
.o. g
.o. m
.o. n

.o. h
.o. l
.o. v
.o. r
.o. q
.o. ng
.o. nng
.o. ł  ] ;
